Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 4 Tennessee Cosmetology Act of 1986
62-4-120. Operation of a school.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to operate a school without conspicuously displaying a valid license issued by the board under this chapter.

An application for a license to operate a school shall be submitted by its owner on the form prescribed by the board. The application shall be accompanied by:

A fee as set by the board;

The proposed hours of operation for the school; and

A true and exact copy of the standard contract that each prospective student shall be required to execute for enrollment.

A person, firm or corporation shall be eligible to receive a license or renewal of a license to operate a school only if the school employs at least:

One (1) licensed instructor, where the enrollment is twenty (20) students or less;

Two (2) licensed instructors, or one (1) licensed instructor and one (1) junior instructor who has not been employed as a junior instructor for more than three (3) years, where the enrollment is greater than twenty (20) but no greater than forty (40) students; and

One (1) additional licensed instructor or junior instructor who has not been employed as a junior instructor for more than three (3) years, for each additional enrollment of twenty (20) students or fraction of twenty (20) students.

For the purposes of this subsection (c), “student” does not include persons enrolled in an instructor training program or junior instructor.

A school shall employ at least one (1) licensed instructor for each junior instructor employed.

Any school offering an instructor training program shall conduct instruction for instructor trainees at a different time or in a separate classroom from instruction for students.

Prior to the opening of a new school or the relocation of an existing school, the school must pass an initial inspection by at least one (1) member of the board. The inspection shall be made within ten (10) days of receipt by the board of a request for the inspection.

If a new school passes the required inspection, the board shall issue a license to operate the new school. A new school shall be closed to the public for ninety (90) days.

If a relocated school passes the required inspection, the board shall reissue the license showing the change of address upon receipt of a fee as set by the board.

If the ownership of a school changes, the new owner may not operate the school more than thirty (30) days after the date of the change of ownership unless, within the thirty-day period, the new owner has submitted an application for a license to operate the school in accordance with subsection (b). The school shall not be considered as a new school for purposes of subdivision (b)(3).

If the transferred school passes an inspection by at least one (1) member of the board, the board shall issue a license to operate the school to the new owner.

A prospective purchaser of a school may request the board to determine whether, or on what conditions, the prospective purchaser would be qualified for licensure under this chapter. The request shall be submitted on the form prescribed by the board and shall be accompanied by a fee as set by the board. The prospective purchaser will receive a license to operate the school if, within six (6) months after receipt of a favorable determination from the board, the prospective purchaser:

Acquires ownership of the school;

Files an application for the license in accordance with subsection (b); and

Fulfills any conditions stipulated by the board.

Each school shall be inspected at least annually by an inspector or a member of the board.

In addition to the schools currently operated pursuant to this section, the board shall establish rules and regulations for separate schools that specialize solely in natural hair styling, manicuring and the practice of aesthetics; provided, that at a minimum, such specialized schools remain subject to the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board shall establish rules and regulations enabling schools operated pursuant to this section to develop courses of instruction in practice and theory that will satisfy the requirements of § 62-4-110, and that consist of:

Earning fifty percent (50%) of the hours needed for the specific license from classroom training; and

Fifty percent (50%) of the hours needed for the specific license from apprenticing under the supervision of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter, who has at least ten (10) years of experience.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 20; 1988, ch. 902, § 11; 1989, ch. 93, §§ 7-11; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 131-133; 1996, ch. 897, § 13; 2013, ch. 447, § 1; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 26-28; 2016, ch. 991, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Former §§ 62-4-120 and 62-4-121 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 7139.13 (Williams, § 7139.29); Acts 1951, ch. 227, § 4 (Williams, § 7139.22a); 1959, ch. 298, § 12; 1975, ch. 104, § 2; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 5, 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-420, 62-421), concerning registration and licensing of students, were repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 633, § 24.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2013, ch. 447, § 2 provided that the state board of cosmetology is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which added subsections (j) and (k) [now (i) and (j)]. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-121. License to operate a school.

A license to operate a school shall expire on September 1 of each year. An application for renewal of the license shall be accompanied by satisfactory proof that the applicant continues to meet the requirements of § 62-4-120(c).

No renewal application shall be accepted after September 30 following the expiration date of a license to operate a school; however, the board may, in its discretion, reinstate a former licensee upon proper application accompanied by all past unpaid renewal fees, the fee for the current year, and a surcharge for processing the application.

The board shall promulgate rules pursuant to its authority in § 62-4-112 to establish:

An annual fee for the renewal of a license to operate a school;

A penalty fee to be assessed on any renewal application postmarked after the expiration date of the license; and

The amount of the surcharge required pursuant to subsection (b).

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 21; 1992, ch. 968, § 6; 2014, ch. 863, § 2; 2015, ch. 402, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Former §§ 62-4-120 and 62-4-121 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 7139.13 (Williams, § 7139.29); Acts 1951, ch. 227, § 4 (Williams, § 7139.22a); 1959, ch. 298, § 12; 1975, ch. 104, § 2; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 5, 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-420, 62-421), concerning registration and licensing of students, were repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 633, § 24.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2014, ch. 863, § 4, effective May 1, 2014, and expiring June 30, 2015, provided that the state board of cosmetology may promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of Section 2 of this act, which added former subsection (e) to this section. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-4-122. Students.

A school may enroll only a student who:

Has attained the age of at least sixteen (16) years; and

Has completed and passed at least two (2) years of high school or received at least a score of thirty-eight percent (38%) on the GED(R) or HiSET(R) examination. Public and vocational schools are exempt from this section.

There shall be at least one (1) licensed instructor on the premises whenever a cosmetology school, public high school or a state vocational technical school offering cosmetology courses is in operation.

A school operating both day and night classes shall designate the times for each group of classes. In no event shall a student attend school for more than ten (10) hours per day, six (6) days per week, or forty-eight (48) hours per week.

No student may render cosmetology services on patrons until the student has received at least two hundred (200) hours of instruction and acquired the requisite skill and knowledge. Students may render cosmetology services only within a school while under the direct supervision of a licensed instructor.

Students may render manicuring services on patrons upon receiving at least one hundred (100) hours of instruction and acquiring the requisite skill and knowledge. Students may render manicuring services only within a school while under the direct supervision of a licensed instructor.

No student may render aesthetician services on patrons until the student has received at least one hundred fifty (150) hours of instruction and has acquired the requisite skill and knowledge. Students may render aesthetician services only within a school under the direct supervision of a licensed instructor.

Each school shall conspicuously display within the clinic area a sign that reads as follows: “ALL SERVICES IN THIS SCHOOL PERFORMED BY STUDENTS ONLY.”

No school shall pay compensation to its students, either directly or indirectly, or advertise for clinical patrons without clearly disclosing that the services will be performed by students within a school.

Each school shall:

Comply with the rules of sanitation promulgated by the board under § 62-4-125;

Have and maintain equipment and other instructional materials that are determined by the board to be reasonably necessary for the proper training of all students enrolled;

Teach the curriculum prescribed by the board; and

Maintain regular class and instruction hours.

Each school, including any public school conducting a career and technical education program in the field of cosmetology, shall:

Keep a daily record of the attendance of each student enrolled; and

Submit to the board on the prescribed form a monthly progress report on each student enrolled.

A student may render natural hair styling services on patrons upon receiving at least one hundred (100) hours of instruction and acquiring the requisite skill and knowledge. Students may render natural hair styling services only within a school while under the direct supervision of a licensed instructor.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 22; 1988, ch. 902, § 17; 1989, ch. 93, § 12; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 14, 15, 25; 2015, ch. 55, § 18; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 30, 31; 2016, ch. 991, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-123. Time period for completion of coursework.

A student shall have seven (7) years from the date the student originally enrolls in a school to complete the required courses and number of hours required when the student originally enrolls. If the student fails to complete the course of instruction within that time period, the board may require the student to complete additional courses or attain additional number of hours prior to issuing a license to the person.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 23; 1996, ch. 897, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-124. Teaching outside licensed school.

No teaching of cosmetology, whether to students or licensees, is lawful except in a duly operated school; however, for purposes of this section, “teaching of cosmetology” does not include demonstrations of the technical applications of cosmetology products conducted by manufacturers or dealers, or both; provided, that only students or licensees are in attendance. “Teaching of cosmetology” also does not include instruction in new developments in cosmetology; provided, that the instruction is conducted within cosmetology shops and only students or licensees are in attendance.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 24; 1990, ch. 1026, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-125. Health and safety rules and regulations.

The board shall, with the approval of the department of health, promulgate rules of sanitation that it may deem reasonably necessary, with particular attention to the precautions for preventing the development and spread of infections and contagious diseases.

Each school and shop shall have:

Adequate restroom facilities, except when located in a commercial building where such facilities are already provided; and

Separate entrances from entrances to adjoining residential or living quarters, if any.

Where a school and a shop are operated in the same building, there shall be separate entrances and exits and separate restroom facilities for each business.

It is unlawful:

For the owner or manager of any school or shop to permit any person to sleep in or use for residential purposes any room used wholly or partially as a school or shop; and

For any person, firm or corporation that holds a cosmetology, manicurist or aesthetician license to practice cosmetology outside a shop or school, or for any person, firm or corporation that holds a natural hair styling license to practice natural hair styling outside a shop or school, except:

In any nursing home;

In the recipient's residence, short-term residence, or place of business;

In any hospital or infirmary;

In a funeral establishment;

In a retail establishment, to demonstrate or apply, or both, cosmetics without charge;

At the site of television, motion picture, video or theatrical productions, photographic sessions or similar activities; or

In a licensed mobile shop.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 25; 1988, ch. 902, § 14; 1990, ch. 1026, § 12; 1996, ch. 897, § 26; 2013, ch. 477, § 1; 2016, ch. 983, § 5; 2018, ch. 979, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Cross-References. Publication of rules, § 62-4-107.

62-4-126. Identification of school or shop.

Each school and shop, including one located in a private residence, shall display at its entrance a sign of sufficient size to be clearly visible from the street indicating that it is a school or shop.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-127. Inspections — Cause for suspension, revocation, or for denial of license.

The board or its authorized representatives may, at reasonable hours, inspect any place of business operated by any person licensed under this chapter.

The board may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew any license under this chapter for any of the following causes:

Fraud in procuring a license;

Unprofessional, immoral or dishonorable conduct;

Addiction to intoxicating liquors or drugs;

The sale or distribution of wine, beer, liquor or any alcoholic beverages or drugs on the premises of any cosmetology, manicuring, or aesthetics establishment is prohibited; however, wine, beer, liquor or alcoholic beverages may be served to a patron without a charge, but no such beverages shall be served to a patron who is intoxicated or believed to be intoxicated;

Unlawful invasion of the field of practice of any profession;

Receipt of fees or payment on the assurance that any incurable disease can be cured;

Conviction of a felony, if the felony conviction occurred within three (3) years prior to the board's decision to suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license. However, an action taken under this subdivision (b)(7)(A) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title; or

Conviction of any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, if the misdemeanor conviction occurred within one (1) year prior to the board's decision to suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license. However, an action taken under this subdivision (b)(7)(B) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

Any cause for which issuance of a license could have been refused had it existed and been known to the board at the time of issuance;

A violation of this chapter or of any rules duly promulgated under this chapter; or

Failure to comply with a lawful order of the board.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 27; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 17, 18; 2015, ch. 267, § 1; 2018, ch. 745, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 267, § 2 provided that the act, which amended (b)(7), shall apply to actions by the board on or after April 24, 2015.

62-4-128. Licenses neither transferable nor assignable.

No license issued under this chapter is transferable or assignable.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 28.

62-4-129. Penalties — Jurisdiction.

A violation of this chapter or of any rules promulgated under this chapter is a Class B misdemeanor.

In addition to the powers and duties otherwise conferred upon the board, it is empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction of any person in this state who is violating this chapter and chapter 3 of this title, either with or without a license under this chapter and chapter 3 of this title, to enjoin that person from continuing to violate these chapters. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear and determine such causes.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 29; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2014, ch. 964, § 11.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Do Your Job: Judicial Review of Occupational Licensing in the Face of Economic Protectionism, 70 Vand. L. Rev. 1663 (2017).

62-4-130. Administrative procedures.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 30.

62-4-131. Renewal of manicurist and shampooer licenses.

Any person holding a valid manicurist and shampooer license on August 1, 1987, shall be entitled to renew the license, so long as a complete renewal application with all appropriate fees is filed with the board no later than September 30 immediately following the license expiration date. If the application is mailed, the postmark of the United States postal service shall be considered the filing date.

Any application for renewal of a manicurist and shampooer license that is filed with the board after September 30 of the year in which the license expires shall be denied. The board shall not reinstate a former manicurist and shampooer licensee who fails to comply with subsection (a).

The board may, in its discretion, issue a manicurist license to a former manicurist and shampooer licensee upon proper application accompanied by all past unpaid renewal fees, the fee for the current license period and a surcharge as set by the board. If the application is made in the same fiscal year as the board denies the applicant's manicurist and shampooer renewal application, the fees submitted with the denied application shall be credited toward the amount due for a manicurist license under this subsection (c). The board shall not issue a manicurist license to an applicant whose manicurist and shampooer license has lapsed for three (3) years or longer unless the applicant passes a practical and state law examination.

Acts 1988, ch. 902, § 12; 1989, ch. 93, § 13; 1989, ch. 523, § 134.

62-4-132. Retired inactive license.

Any person licensed under this chapter may retire the license by submitting a form prescribed by the board accompanied by the current active license and a fee in an amount set by rules promulgated by the board. Upon receipt of an acceptable application to retire the license, the board shall issue a retired inactive license certificate to the retiree. The holder of a retired license shall not be entitled to engage in the practice of any of the areas for which a license is issued under this chapter until the person's license is reactivated in a manner approved by the board.

Acts 1996, ch. 897, § 7; 2015, ch. 402, § 32.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-133. Promulgation of rules — Use of banned chemicals and gases.

The board shall, with approval of the department of health, promulgate rules that may be deemed reasonably necessary to insulate or otherwise sufficiently protect the employees and customers of cosmetology, manicure and skin care shops from poisonous or harmful chemical substances or gases.

Within a cosmetology, manicure or skin care shop, liquid methyl methacrylate products and other chemical substances and gases banned by the United States food and drug administration may not be used in any manner that is inconsistent with the requirements, terms and conditions of the ban.

Acts 2000, ch. 607, § 1.

62-4-134. Natural hair styling services.

A licensed natural hair stylist may render natural hair styling services without the supervision of a licensed cosmetologist. Natural hair stylists may render services only in an establishment licensed by the board.

Acts 2002, ch. 706, § 1.

62-4-135. Hair braiding services.

As used in this section:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance, or the commissioner's designee; and

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance.

Before engaging in hair braiding, a person shall:

Attend sixteen (16) hours of training in health and hygiene, either in person or online, as approved by the commissioner, receive a certificate indicating attendance from the training, attest to the one-time training at biennial registration, and retain and display the certificate on request;

Biennially register with the department, providing a name, address, and phone number at which the person can be reached, and pay a registration fee of thirty dollars ($30.00);

Use only disposable instruments or implements that are sanitized in a disinfectant approved for hospital use or approved by the federal environmental protection agency; and

Post a notice at the place of operation indicating that the person is not licensed by the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

A person providing hair braiding services pursuant to this section shall not refer to themselves as a licensed natural hair stylist unless the person otherwise meets the requirements under § 62-4-110(f).

Acts 2019, ch. 207, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-4-135 concerned the requirements for authorization as postsecondary institution by board.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 207, § 4. July 1, 2019; provided that, for the purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect April 25, 2019.

62-4-136. [Repealed.]

Acts 2014, ch. 863, § 3; 2015, ch. 358, § 3; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 358, § 3, effective June 30, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-4-136 concerned filing of complaints with board against school for violation of part and an action to revoke authorization.

62-4-137. Animals permitted in shops.

No animals, except service animals, fish for decorative purposes, and birds in cages shall be permitted in any shop. Bird cages in shops shall be cleaned daily. Departmental inspectors shall ensure that bird cages are cleaned sufficiently to prevent any hazard to human health or well-being.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-138. License for mobile shop.

No person shall operate a mobile shop without a valid mobile shop license issued by the board. Application for the license shall be made upon application forms furnished by the board.

The board shall issue a license for a mobile shop to an applicant who:

Holds a valid, current license for a shop that has a fixed location;

Pays an application fee in an amount set by the board by rule, not to exceed the cost of administering this section;

Pays an initial license fee in the amount set by the board by rule; and

Undergoes and passes an initial inspection.

A license for a mobile shop shall be subject to renewal at the same time that the licensee's shop license is subject to renewal pursuant to § 62-4-118(h). The renewal fee for a license for a mobile shop shall be set by the board by rule.

A mobile shop for which a license is issued shall be subject to all of the health and safety requirements that apply to shops that have a fixed location under this chapter and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto; provided, that a mobile shop shall not be required to have a restroom and that the board may promulgate rules allowing or requiring mobile shops to have equipment different from shops with a fixed location.

The board may either refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke any license for a mobile shop for any of the reasons in § 62-4-127.

The board shall revoke any license for a mobile shop if the licensee's license for a shop that has a fixed location expires or is revoked.

If a licensee's license for a shop that has a fixed location is suspended, the board shall also suspend any license that has been issued to such licensee for a mobile shop for the same period of time.

Acts 2016, ch. 983, § 4.